th: วัตถุประสงค์การใช้งานของยางยืด: งานฝีมือ/อเนกประสงค์; หน้ากาก; เครื่องประดับผม; ชุดชั้นใน/กางเกงใน; เสื้อผ้าทางการแพทย์/ศัลยกรรมกระดูก; งานควิลท์; ชุดว่ายน้ำ; งานหุ้มเบาะ; ขอบเอว/ตัดเย็บเสื้อผ้า; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Elastické zamýšľané použitie: Ručné práce/všeobecné použitie; Rúška; Doplnky do vlasov; Spodná bielizeň; Zdravotnícke/ortopedické odevy; Prešívanie; Plavky; Čalúnenie; Pásy/šitie odevov; Iné
ko: 고무줄 용도: 공예/일반용; 마스크용; 헤어 액세서리용; 란제리/속옷용; 의료/정형외과 의류용; 퀼팅용; 수영복용; 실내 장식용; 허리밴드/의류 재봉용; 기타
lt-LT: Elastinės juostos numatyta paskirtis: Rankdarbiams / bendrosios paskirties; Veido kaukėms; Plaukų aksesuarams; Apatiniam trikotažui; Medicininei / ortopedinei aprangai; Daigstymui; Maudymosi aprangai; Apmušalams; Juosmeniui / drabužių siuvimui; Kita
ro-RO: Utilizarea prevăzută a elasticului: Lucru manual/Uz general; Măști faciale; Accesorii pentru păr; Lenjerie intimă; Articole vestimentare medicale/ortopedice; Matlasare; Costume de baie; Tapițerie; Beteală/Cusut îmbrăcăminte; Altele
vi: Mục đích sử dụng của thun: Thủ công/mục đích chung; Khẩu trang; Phụ kiện tóc; Đồ lót/nội y; Quần áo y tế/chỉnh hình; Chần bông; Đồ bơi; Bọc nệm; Lưng quần/may mặc; Khác
sl-SI: Elastična predvidena uporaba: Ustvarjanje/splošna uporaba; Zaščitne maske; Dodatki za lase; Žensko perilo/spodnje perilo; Medicinska/ortopedska oblačila; Prešivanje; Kopalke; Oblazinjenje; Šivanje pasov/oblačil; Drugo
hr-HR: Elastična namjena: Izrada rukotvorina / opća namjena; Maske za lice; Dodaci za kosu; Žensko rublje / donje rublje; Medicinska / ortopedska odjeća; Prošivanje; Kupaći kostimi; Tapeciranje; Pasice / šivanje odjeće; Ostalo
ja: 弾性体の想定用途: クラフト/多目的; フェイスマスク; ヘアアクセサリー; ランジェリー/下着; 医療/整形外科用衣類; キルティング; 水着; 室内装飾; ウエストバンド/アパレル縫製; その他
ru: Предназначение эластичной ленты: Рукоделие/общего назначения; Маски для лица; Аксессуары для волос; Нижнее белье; Медицинская/ортопедическая одежда; Квилтинг; Купальники; Обивка мебели; Пояса/пошив одежды; Другое
sv: Elastisk avsedd användning: Pyssel/allmänt bruk; Ansiktsmasker; Håraccessoarer; Underkläder; Medicinska/ortopediska plagg; Quiltning; Badkläder; Möbeltapetsering; Midjeband/klädsömnad; Övrigt
da: Tilsigtet anvendelse af elastik: Hobby/generel brug; Ansigtsmasker; Hårtilbehør; Lingeri/undertøj; Medicinsk/ortopædisk tøj; Quiltning; Badetøj; Møbelpolstring; Linning/syning af tøj; Andet
en: Elastic intended use: Crafting/general purpose; Face masks; Hair accessories; Lingerie/underwear; Medical/orthopedic garments; Quilting; Swimwear; Upholstery; Waistband/apparel sewing; Other
nb: Elastisk tiltenkt bruk: Håndverk / generelt bruk; Munnbind; Hårtilbehør; Undertøy / intimklær; Medisinske/ortopediske plagg; Quilting; Badetøy; Møbeltrekk; Linning/klessøm; Annet
tr: Elastik kullanım amacı: El işi/genel amaçlı; Yüz maskeleri; Saç aksesuarları; İç çamaşırı; Tıbbi/ortopedik giysiler; Kapitone; Mayo; Döşeme; Bel bandı/giysi dikimi; Diğer
zh-CN: 松紧带预期用途: 手工/通用; 口罩; 发饰; 内衣; 医疗/骨科服装; 绗缝; 泳装; 室内装潢; 腰带/服装缝纫; 其他
it: Uso previsto dell'elastico: Artigianato/uso generale; Mascherine; Accessori per capelli; Lingerie/biancheria intima; Indumenti medici/ortopedici; Trapuntatura; Costumi da bagno; Tappezzeria; Cintura/cucito per abbigliamento; Altro
zh-TW: 鬆緊帶預期用途: 手工藝/通用; 口罩; 髮飾; 內衣/內褲; 醫療/骨科壓力衣; 絎縫; 泳裝; 傢飾布; 褲頭/服飾縫紉; 其他
pl: Zamierzone zastosowanie gumy: Rękodzieło / ogólne przeznaczenie; Maseczki na twarz; Akcesoria do włosów; Bielizna; Odzież medyczna / ortopedyczna; Pikowanie; Odzież kąpielowa; Tapicerka; Paski / szycie odzieży; Inne
bg-BG: Предназначение на ластика: Занаяти/обща употреба; Маски за лице; Аксесоари за коса; Бельо/долни дрехи; Медицинско/ортопедично облекло; Куилтинг; Бански костюми; Тапицерия; Колани/шиене на дрехи; Друго
fi: Kuminauhan käyttötarkoitus: Käsityöt / yleiskäyttö; Kasvomaskit; Hiusasusteet; Alusvaatteet; Lääkinnälliset / ortopediset vaatteet; Tilkkutyöt; Uima-asut; Verhoilu; Vyötärönauha / vaatteiden ompelu; Muu
pt-PT: Uso pretendido elástico: Artesanato/uso geral; Máscaras faciais; Acessórios de cabelo; Lingerie/roupa interior; Roupa médica/ortopédica; Acolchoamento; Fatos de banho; Estofos; Cós/costura de vestuário; Outro
el: Προβλεπόμενη χρήση ελαστικού: Χειροτεχνία/γενική χρήση; Μάσκες προσώπου; Αξεσουάρ μαλλιών; Εσώρουχα; Ιατρικά/ορθοπεδικά ενδύματα; Καπιτονάρισμα; Μαγιό; Ταπετσαρία; Ζώνη μέσης/ράψιμο ενδυμάτων; Άλλο
pt-BR: Uso pretendido do elástico: Artesanato/uso geral; Máscaras faciais; Acessórios de cabelo; Lingerie/roupa íntima; Roupas médicas/ortopédicas; Quilting; Moda praia; Estofamento; Cós/costura de roupas; Outro
nl: Elastiek beoogd gebruik: Knutselen/algemeen gebruik; Mondkapjes; Haaraccessoires; Lingerie/ondergoed; Medische/orthopedische kleding; Quilten; Zwemkleding; Stoffering; Tailleband/kleding naaien; Overige
de: Verwendungszweck des Gummibands: Basteln/Allzweck; Gesichtsmasken; Haar-Accessoires; Dessous/Unterwäsche; Medizinische/orthopädische Kleidung; Quilten; Bademode; Polsterung; Taillenbund/Kleidungsnähen; Sonstige
fr: Usage prévu de l’élastique: Artisanat/usage général; Masques faciaux; Accessoires pour cheveux; Lingerie/sous-vêtements; Vêtements médicaux/orthopédiques; Matelassage; Maillots de bain; Rembourrage; Ceinture/couture de vêtements; Autre
cs: Elastické zamýšlené použití: Tvoření / obecné použití; Roušky; Vlasové doplňky; Spodní prádlo; Zdravotnické/ortopedické oděvy; Quilting; Plavky; Čalounění; Pásky / šití oděvů; Jiné
hu: Rugalmas anyag rendeltetésszerű használata: Kézműves/általános célú; Arcmaszkok; Hajkiegészítők; Fehérnemű/alsónemű; Orvosi/ortopéd ruházat; Foltvarrás; Fürdőruha; Kárpitozás; Derékpánt/ruhavarrás; Egyéb
es: Uso previsto del elástico: Manualidades/uso general; Mascarillas; Accesorios para el cabello; Lencería/ropa interior; Prendas médicas/ortopédicas; Acolchado; Trajes de baño; Tapicería; Pretinas/costura de ropa; Otro